Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
In General

§ 49-7-1.
Definitions and interpretations.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions and interpretations shall govern unless otherwise provided:

The following wild animals are classed as game: bear, white-tailed deer, rabbits and squirrels.

The following wild animals are classed as fur-bearing animals: muskrats, opossums, otters, weasels, minks, raccoons and bobcats.

The following wild animals are classed as nuisance animals: wild hogs, nutria, beaver, fox, skunks and coyote.

All freshwater fish in the following families are classed as game fish: Sunfish family (Centrarchidae) – including largemouth bass (Micropterus salmoides), smallmouth bass (Micropterus dolomieu), spotted bass (Micropterus punctulatus), white crappie (Pomoxis annularis), black crappie (Pomoxis nigromaculatus), redear sunfish (Lepomis microlophus), bluegill (Lepomis macrochiris), warmouth (Lepomis gulosus), green sunfish (Lepomis cyanellus), longear sunfish (Lepomis megalotis), redbreast sunfish (Lepomis auritus) and shadow bass (Ambloplites ariommus); Perch family (Percidae) – including walleye (Stizostedion vitreum), sauger (Stizostedion canadense) and yellow perch (Perca flavescens); Pike family (Esocidae) – including redfin pickerel (Esox americanus americanus), grass pickerel (Esox americanus vermiculatus), chain pickerel (Esox niger); Temperate bass family (Moronidae) including – white bass (Morone chrysops), yellow bass (Morone mississippiensis), striped bass (Morone saxatilis) and hybrid striped bass (Morone chrysops x Morone saxatilis and/or Morone saxatilis x Morone chrysops).

The following fish are classed as nongame gross fish: in the Herring family (Clupeidae) – gizzard shad (Dorosoma cepedianum), threadfin shad (Dorosoma petenense); in the Catfish family (Ictaluridae) – channel catfish (Ictalurus punctatus), blue catfish (Ictalurus furcatus), flathead catfish (Pylodictus olivaris), yellow bullhead (Ameiurus natalis), black bullhead (Ameiurus melas), brown bullhead (Ameiurus nebulosus); in the Gar family – spotted gar (Lepisosteus oculatus), longnose gar (Lepisosteus osseus), shortnose gar (Lepisosteus platostomus), alligator gar (Atractosteus spatula); in the Eel family (Anguillidae) – American eel (Anguilla rostrata); in the Bowfin family (Amiidae) – bowfin (Amia calva); in the Paddlefish family (Polyodontidae) – paddlefish (Polyodon spathula); in the Minnow family (Cyprinidae) – common carp (Cyprinus carpio); in the Sucker family (Catostomidae) – river carpsucker (Carpoides carpio), quillback (Carpoides cyprinus), highfin carpsucker (Carpoides velifer), spotted sucker (Minytrema melanops), blacktail redhorse (Moxostoma poecilurum), smallmouth buffalo (Ictiobus bubalus), bigmouth buffalo (Ictiobus cyprinellus), black buffalo (Ictiobus niger); in the Drum family (Sciaenidae) – freshwater drum (Aplodinotus grunniens).

All fish native to Mississippi that are not classed as game fish or nongame gross fish are classed as nongame fish.

All fish native to foreign countries and all fish native to the United States but not native to Mississippi are classed as nonnative fish.

The following are classed as game birds: geese, brant ducks, rails, coots, snipe, gallinules, moorhens, woodcock, crow, mergansers, wild turkey, quail and doves.

All other species of wild resident or migratory birds are classed as nongame birds.

Closed season: the time during which birds, animals or fish may not be taken.

Open season: the time during which birds, animals or fish may be lawfully taken.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Executive director” means the Executive Director of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5867; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1938, ch. 364; Laws, 1946, ch. 423, § 5; Laws, 1948, ch. 251, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 188, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 475, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 529, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 373, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 522, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 499, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 27, 2007.).

§ 49-7-1.1.
Declaration of public policy.

Hunting, trapping and fishing are vital parts of the heritage of the State of Mississippi. It shall be the public policy of the State of Mississippi to protect and preserve these activities. The Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, acting by and through the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, may regulate hunting, trapping and fishing activities in the State of Mississippi, consistent with its powers and duties under the law. No court of this state may enjoin, suspend, curtail or abrogate any hunting, trapping or fishing activity which is otherwise lawful under the laws of this state or the regulations of the commission, except upon a showing, by clear and convincing evidence, of an immediate threat to the public health, safety and welfare, or other imminent peril. It is, and shall be, the public policy of this state to promote hunting, trapping and fishing and other outdoor recreational opportunities and to preserve these activities for all generations to come.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 520, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 10, 2007.).

§ 49-7-2.
“Social Security Administration” construed to include Railroad Retirement Board.

The term “Social Security Administration,” wherever used in Title 49, Chapter 7, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall also be construed to include the Railroad Retirement Board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 354, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 49-7-3.
Issuance of resident hunting or fishing licenses; possession of license.

Any resident of the State of Mississippi shall be entitled to receive a resident fishing license.

Any person domiciled within the State of Mississippi shall be entitled to receive a resident hunting license provided in Section 49-7-5. The domicile of a person is that person’s principal or primary home or place of abode. A “principal or primary home or place of abode” is that home or place in which a person’s habitation is fixed and to which he, whenever absent, has the present intention of returning after a departure of absence therefrom, regardless of the duration of the absence. The burden of proving domicile shall be on the person claiming such status. The following evidence or other reliable evidence may be considered in establishing, but is not necessarily determinative of, domicile: driver’s license, residence for income or other tax purposes, homestead exemption receipt, or any other means prescribed by the department. In the case of minors, domicile of the parents shall be used as evidence of the minor’s domicile.

A nondomiciliary of the state may be issued a resident hunting or fishing license or combination resident hunting/fishing license upon providing the following:

A current identification card from a Mississippi college or university; or

A current military identification card showing that the person is an active member of the United States Armed Forces (excluding Reserves and the National Guard) and proof that the person is stationed on a military base in Mississippi.

A nondomiciliary of the state may be issued a special Armed Forces fourteen-day hunting and fishing license with the same hunting and fishing privileges and at the same fee of a resident sportsman’s license, if the nondomiciliary is an active member of the United States Armed Forces (excluding Reserves and the National Guard) and his application is approved by the department. The applicant must file his application for the special fourteen-day license in the office of the department. The department shall establish requirements for proof of active military status and any other requirements it deems desirable. The department shall not issue more than two (2) special fourteen-day licenses to the same applicant per license year.

A holder of a resident or nonresident license is required to carry the license on his person while engaged in hunting, trapping or fishing. Any penalty for not carrying a license while engaged in hunting, trapping or fishing shall be waived if the person can verify purchase of a license prior to the date of the violation.

Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5870; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1950, ch. 218, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 178; Laws, 1962, ch. 189, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 285, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 371, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 416, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 563, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 408, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 580, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 18; Laws, 1999, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 587, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 49-7-4.
Exemption of records relating to hunting, fishing and trapping license applications and holders of such licenses from Mississippi Public Records Act.

The records of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks relating to applications for and sales of any resident or nonresident licenses issued under this chapter, and all records related to holders of such licenses, are exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983, in accordance with Section 25-61-11, and shall be released only upon order of a court having proper jurisdiction over a petition for release of the record or records. However, upon request, the records specified in this section shall be available to all law enforcement agencies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 428, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 49-7-5.
Fees for resident hunting, fishing, and combination hunting and fishing licenses; exemptions.

Any resident, as defined in Section 49-7-3, upon application, shall receive a combination resident hunting and fishing license for the sum of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). The license shall qualify the licensee to hunt under this chapter all game and fowl, including deer and turkey, and to fish in any county of the state.

Any resident, as defined in Section 49-7-3, upon application, shall receive a resident combination small game hunting and fishing license for the sum of Ten Dollars ($10.00) together with the fee provided in Section 49-7-17 to the office or agent issuing the license. The hunting license shall qualify the licensee to hunt and fish under this chapter all game and fowl, except deer and turkey, in any county in the state.

Any resident, as defined in Section 49-7-3, upon application, shall receive a sportsman’s license for the sum of Forty-five Dollars ($45.00). The license shall qualify the licensee to hunt under this chapter all game and fowl, including deer and turkey, and to fish as provided by law, in any county in the state, and to hunt using primitive weapons and bow and arrow in the manner provided by law. The commission may notify the licensee of the expiration of his license, and the licensee may renew the license by mailing the sum of Forty-five Dollars ($45.00) to the commission. A licensee who has not renewed the license within thirty (30) days after the expiration date shall be removed from the commission’s records, and the licensee must apply to be placed on the renewal list.

In addition to a hunting license allowing the taking of turkey, a resident who hunts turkey during a fall turkey season must purchase a fall turkey hunting permit for a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00) plus the fee provided in Section 49-7-17. A resident sportsman’s licensee or resident lifetime sportsman’s licensee may hunt during the fall turkey season without purchasing a permit.

The commission may offer a resident apprentice hunting license for a resident who does not have the required certificate of hunter education and may set the fee for the apprentice hunting license. An apprentice license may be purchased only one (1) time by a resident and the apprentice hunting licensee must be accompanied by a licensed or exempt resident hunter at least twenty-one (21) years of age when hunting.

Any resident citizen of the State of Mississippi who has not reached the age of sixteen (16) years or who has reached the age of sixty-five (65) years, or any resident citizen who is blind, paraplegic, or a multiple amputee, or who has been adjudged by the Veterans Administration as having a total service-connected disability, or has been adjudged to be totally disabled by the Social Security Administration shall not be required to purchase or have in his possession, a hunting or fishing license while engaged in such activities. A person exempt by reason of total service-connected disability, as adjudged by the Veterans Administration or who has been adjudged to be totally disabled by the Social Security Administration or who is blind, paraplegic or a multiple amputee, shall have in their possession and on their person proof of their age, residency, disability status or other respective physical impairment while engaged in the activities of hunting or fishing.

Any resident who is a member of the Armed Forces, including the Reserves and National Guard, and on active duty outside the State of Mississippi is not required to purchase or have in his possession a hunting or fishing license while engaged in such activities on leave from active duty. The resident shall have in his possession and on his person any proof as may be required by the commission.

All exempt hunting and fishing licenses previously issued for disabilities shall be null and void effective July 1, 1993.

The commission may offer a youth all-game hunting and fishing license for exempt youths who have a hunter education certificate and an all-game hunting and fishing license for other persons exempted under paragraph (a). Youths and other exempt persons shall not be required to purchase this license or have it in possession while hunting or fishing. The commission may establish a fee not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00) for the licenses.

The requirement for purchasing and/or having a hunting or fishing license authorized in subsection (1) of this section may be waived for any resident or nonresident who is an honorably discharged veteran with a combat-related disability and who will be participating in a special hunt, fishing trip or other outdoor recreational event that is available only to such persons as determined by the entity sponsoring the event. The commission is authorized to establish such criteria and/or procedures for an organization to be recognized as a sanctioned entity that provides unique outdoor recreational opportunities for wounded or disabled veterans. Any events sponsored by a recognized organization, and the persons participating in such event, shall be entitled to the waiver set forth above without further action on the part of the commission or the sponsoring organization.

No license shall be required of residents to hunt, fish or trap on lands in which the record title is vested in such person.

Any person or persons exempt under this section from procuring a license shall be subject to and must comply with all other terms and provisions of this chapter.

Any person authorized to issue any license under this section may collect and retain for the issuance of each license the additional fee authorized under Section 49-7-17.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 5871, 5876; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1944, ch. 237, § 1; Laws, 1954, ch. 172; Laws, 1956, ch. 150; Laws, 1958, ch. 174; Laws, 1962, ch. 189, § 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 263, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 372, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 435, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 463, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 547, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 342, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 486, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 501, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 418, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 426, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§§ 49-7-6 and 49-7-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1989, ch. 377, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§49-7-6. [En Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 6; Laws, 1982, ch. 435, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 435, § 3]

§49-7-7. [Codes, 1942, § 5872; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1938, ch. 178; Laws, 1948, ch. 255, § 5; Laws, 1948, ch. 255, § 8; Laws, 1954, ch. 168, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 264, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 258, § 1; Am Laws, 1974, ch. 452; Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 3; Laws, 1982, ch. 435, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 435, § 4]

§ 49-7-7.
Use of revenue from increase in license fees.

The revenue collected from any increase in license fees pursuant to Chapter 418, Laws of 2016, shall be designated for use by the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks for recruitment, training, equipping and compensation of conservation officers to fill existing vacancies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 418, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 49-7-8.
Hunting, fishing or trapping license for nonresident; fees; violations.

No nonresident sixteen (16) years of age or older may hunt, fish, kill, take or trap any game animal, bird or fish without having acquired and having in his immediate possession a valid license issued by the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

The commission shall have the following duties and powers:

To prescribe the forms and types of nonresident licenses that a nonresident must obtain;

To determine the total number of each type of nonresident license to be issued annually;

To establish fees for nonresident licenses and the collection fees for the agent issuing such licenses; provided, however, that the fee for a nonresident all game hunting license shall not be less than Sixty Dollars ($60.00);

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to develop a nonresident licensing program.

A nonresident who violates this section or any licensing regulation of the commission is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-21(3).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 345, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 49-7-9.
Resident fishing licenses.

Each resident of the State of Mississippi, as defined in Section 49-7-3, fishing in the public fresh waters of the state, including lakes and reservoirs, but not including privately owned ponds and streams, shall purchase a combination small game hunting and fishing license as provided in Section 49-7-5 for Ten Dollars ($10.00). Any resident purchasing a license as prescribed in this subsection shall be entitled to fish, in accordance with the regulations and ordinances of the commission, in all public fresh waters within the territory of the State of Mississippi.

A resident may purchase a resident fishing license valid for a period of three (3) days for the sum of Three Dollars ($3.00).

No license shall be required of any resident citizen of the State of Mississippi who has not reached the age of sixteen (16) years or who has reached the age of sixty-five (65) years or who is blind, paraplegic, a multiple amputee or has been adjudged by the Veterans Administration as having a total service-connected disability, or has been adjudged totally disabled by the Social Security Administration. Such person shall not be required to purchase or have in his possession a hunting or fishing license while engaged in such activities.

A person exempt by reason of age, total service-connected disability as adjudged by the Veterans Administration or total disability as adjudged by the Social Security Administration or who is blind, paraplegic or a multiple amputee, shall have in their possession and on their person proof of their age, residency, disability status or other respective physical impairment while engaged in the activities of hunting or fishing.

Any resident who is a member of the Armed Forces, including the Reserves and National Guard, and on active duty outside the State of Mississippi is not required to purchase or have in his possession a hunting or fishing license while engaged in such activities on leave from active duty. Such resident shall have in his possession and on his person such proof as may be required by the commission.

The requirement for purchasing and/or having a hunting or fishing license authorized in this subsection (1) may be waived for any resident or nonresident who is an honorably discharged veteran with a combat-related disability and who will be participating in a special hunt, fishing trip or other outdoor recreational event that is available only to such persons as determined by the entity sponsoring the event. The commission is authorized to establish such criteria and/or procedures for an organization to be recognized as a sanctioned entity that provides unique outdoor recreational opportunities for wounded or disabled veterans. Any events sponsored by a recognized organization, and the persons participating in such event, shall be entitled to the waiver set forth above without further action on the part of the commission or the sponsoring organization.

All persons fishing in privately owned lakes or ponds shall have specific permission to do so from the owner of such lake or pond.

Residents do not need a fishing license to fish in those waters, except when the owner of the lake or pond charges a fee for fishing, then a resident must have a fishing license to fish in those waters unless exempted under subsection (1) of this section.

The first weekend of “National Fishing and Boating Week” in June of each year is designated as “Free Fishing Weekend.” July 4 is designated as “Free Fishing Day.” Any person may sport fish without a license on “Free Fishing Weekend,” and on “Free Fishing Day.”

Any person authorized to issue any license under this section may collect and retain for issuing each license the additional fee authorized under Section 49-7-17.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5906; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 197; Laws, 1938, ch. 178; Laws, 1938, Ex. Sess. ch. 78; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1958, ch. 175; Laws, 1966, ch. 265, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 4; Laws, 1982, ch. 435, § 5; Laws, 1987, ch. 413; Laws, 1988, ch. 435, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 600; Laws, 1989, ch. 377, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 463, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 409, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 477, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 332, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 418, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 426, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 49-7-9.1.
Commercial fishing licenses; who is required to purchase; labeling of commercial fishing equipment; slat basket license; fees.

Any resident engaged in fishing for commercial purposes and selling or peddling nongame gross fish at retail or selling or shipping same at wholesale, as to markets, dealers or canning plants, shall purchase a commercial fishing license.

A licensee must label each piece of commercial fishing equipment with a waterproof or metal tag containing any information required by the department. A piece of commercial fishing equipment is defined as: One (1) each hoop or barrel net; one thousand (1,000) feet or less of trotline; one thousand (1,000) feet or less of snagline; three thousand (3,000) feet or less of gill netting; or three thousand (3,000) feet or less of trammel netting. Netting of over three thousand (3,000) feet is prohibited.

Upon the purchase of a commercial license for use of hoop or barrel nets, the licensee is permitted to use lead nets thirty-five (35) yards in length for each two (2) barrel nets used, but not to exceed seven (7) lead nets.

Each person taking nongame gross fish as defined in Section 49-7-1, of any kind from the fresh waters of the state shall be considered a producer and shall be entitled to sell his own catch of nongame gross fish to anyone except as otherwise provided by law or applicable regulations.

Each resident buying or handling nongame gross fish secured from commercial fishermen or others for the purpose of resale, whether handled on a commission basis or otherwise, and each resident shipping nongame gross fish not his own catch out of the State of Mississippi shall be considered a wholesale dealer and shall purchase a commercial fishing license. Resident wholesale dealers’ licenses shall be issued only to persons who have been bona fide residents of the State of Mississippi for at least six (6) months.

Each resident buying nongame gross fish from a licensed wholesale dealer or licensed commercial fisherman for retail sale to the consumer only on rural or urban routes shall purchase a commercial fishing license to do so.

Each resident engaged in the buying and selling of nongame gross fish as a wholesale dealer’s agent, whether on a commission or salary basis, or otherwise, and not selling in the open market, shall purchase a commercial fishing license and shall be responsible for any illegal transaction ensuing between the time he purchases the fish from the fisherman and the time the fish are accepted by the wholesaler by whom he is employed.

Any resident using a wooden or plastic slat basket shall purchase a slat basket license for each basket each year in addition to a commercial fishing license. Slat baskets are defined as commercial fishing devices used solely for the capture of catfish and made entirely of wood and/or plastic slats in a box-like or cylindrical shape. Slat baskets shall not exceed six (6) feet in length nor exceed fifteen (15) inches in width and height or diameter, may have no more than two (2) throats, and must have at least four (4) slot openings at least one and one-fourth (1-1/4) by twenty-four (24) inches evenly spaced around the sides of the catch area. The one and one-fourth (1-1/4) inch wide slots or greater must begin at the rear of the basket and run twenty-four (24) inches toward the throat end of the basket. Slat baskets shall be placed at least one hundred (100) yards apart and may not be used with any form of leads, netting or guiding devices.

Each slat basket shall have a waterproof or metal tag attached to it containing any information required by the department. Any other identification of the owner of the slat basket shall meet any specifications required by the department. Slat baskets may be fished statewide except where specifically prohibited.

Any violation of this subsection shall be a Class I violation as prescribed in Section 49-7-141.

It is unlawful for any person to offer for sale undersized nongame gross fish.

The fee for a resident commercial fishing license shall be Thirty Dollars ($30.00).

The fee for a slat basket license shall be Thirty Dollars ($30.00).

Any person authorized to issue any license under this section may collect and retain for issuing each license the additional fee authorized under Section 49-7-17.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 471, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 49-7-10.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms effective July 1, 2012.

§49-7-10. [Laws, 2010, ch. 384, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.]

§ 49-7-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1989, ch. 377, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

[Codes, 1942, § 5904; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1934, ch. 286; Laws, 1936, ch. 221; Laws, 1938, ch. 178; Laws, 1946, ch. 423, § 6; Laws, 1956, ch. 151; Laws, 1968, ch. 258, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 287, § 1; Am Laws, 1973, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 5; Laws, 1982, ch. 435, § 6; Laws, 1988, ch. 435, § 6]

§ 49-7-12.
Reciprocal agreements with other states; nonresident freshwater commercial fishing licenses; fees; penalties.

The commission may promulgate rules and regulations for nonresident recreational and commercial permits and licenses in order to promote and to enter into reciprocal agreements with other states.

The commission may issue and prescribe the forms, types and fees of nonresident freshwater commercial fishing licenses to be sold by the department and not by licensing agents.

The commission may prescribe regulations for nonresident commercial fishing equipment, tagging requirements, harvest size and possession restrictions, restricted areas, fishing restrictions, reporting requirements, wholesale dealers, and the selling, reselling and exporting of fish taken in the public freshwaters of the state.

The commission may exercise all powers necessary to regulate nonresident freshwater commercial fishing.

The commission may require a nonresident to purchase the same type and number of freshwater commercial fishing licenses and pay the same fees that are required of Mississippi residents to engage in like activity in the nonresident’s state.

Any nonresident who engages in freshwater commercial fishing without having the required licenses is guilty of a Class I violation and punishable as provided under Section 49-7-141 and shall forfeit any equipment, gear or nets used in the offense.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 471, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 471, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 49-7-12.1.
Nonresident wholesale dealers who buy certain fish and nonresidents who import certain fish
are required to obtain commercial fishing licenses.

Nonresident wholesale dealers who buy nongame gross fish in the state for the purpose of resale shall obtain a nonresident commercial fishing license.

Any nonresident who imports nongame gross fish into the state for the purpose of resale to a wholesale or retail dealer or to a consumer shall obtain a nonresident commercial fishing license.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 471, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 49-7-13.
Definitions; fee for resident trapper’s license; permission of landowners to trap; certain types of traps prohibited; identification of traps; placing or setting traps near public roads or streets; exemptions; selling of skins and meat of certain animals during and after trapping season.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein, unless the context determines otherwise:

“Raw fur” means the skin that has not been removed from the carcass of a fur-bearing animal or nuisance animal.

“Green pelt” means the skin, with hair or fur attached, that has been removed from a fur-bearing animal or nuisance animal, but has not been tanned or fleshed, stretched and dried.

“Dried pelt” means the skin of a fur-bearing animal or nuisance animal that has been fleshed, stretched and dried.

Any resident of the state sixteen (16) years of age or older, upon application, is entitled to receive a state trapper’s license with tag for the sum of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), plus the fee provided in Section 49-7-17. This license shall be required of each helper or assistant sixteen (16) years of age or older employed or used by a trapper. No license shall be required of a resident who traps on lands in which the record title is vested in that person.

No person shall trap on the lands of another unless he has the permission of the landowner.

No person shall use, on any public lands, a conibear-type or body-gripping trap with an inside jaw spread exceeding seven (7) inches, unless it is partially submerged in water. The designated legal authority of any public lands and its agents shall be exempt from the requirement of this subsection for the purpose of nuisance control.

Each licensed trapper shall have an identification number issued by the department. The licensed trapper shall have the identification number permanently inscribed on the trap or attached to the trap by a metal tag.

A person exempt from purchasing a trapping license must tag or permanently inscribe any trap with his name, phone number and address.

The conservation officer may take up any traps not properly marked.

Every trapper shall visit his traps at least every thirty-six (36) hours.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person shall place or set a trap on or within one hundred (100) feet of any street or public road. Public roads shall not be construed to mean public waterways.

A licensed trapper or resident under sixteen (16) years of age shall be allowed to trap fur-bearing animals during trapping season, and sell or consign the raw fur, green pelts and dried pelts of fur-bearing and nuisance animals during the trapping season and for thirty (30) days after the close of the season. Only a licensed trapper or resident under sixteen (16) years of age may sell or consign the raw fur, green pelts and dried pelts of fur-bearing nuisance animals.

A trapper may not transport the raw fur or green pelts of fur-bearing animals within the state from eleven (11) days after the close of trapping season until the opening day of the following trapping season, unless each raw fur or green pelt is tagged or documented with the name, address and trapping identification number of the person who harvested the raw fur or green pelt and the date and place of harvest. An official possession tag that has been issued by another state shall be considered legally documented.

A licensed trapper may possess and maintain in storage the raw fur, green pelts and dried pelts of fur-bearing and nuisance animals at any time.

The meat of legally acquired raccoons, opossums and muskrats may also be bought and sold during trapping season, and for thirty (30) days after the close of the season.

A municipality or county, or any person who has contracted with a municipality or county for the purpose authorized in this subsection, may place or set only snare traps within one hundred (100) feet of any road or street located within such municipality or county. Before the action authorized by this section is taken, the governing authority of the municipality or the board of supervisors of the county shall make a finding that such placement of snare traps is reasonable and necessary to protect the public safety by removing fur-bearing and nuisance animals that threaten the safety of public roads and bridges. Snares shall be submerged at least fifty percent (50%).

Landowners and their designated agents may place or set snare traps, conibear-type or body-gripping traps, live cage traps and foothold traps on property owned by the landowner within one hundred (100) feet of any road or street, but not within the maintained public road or street right-of-way.

Snare traps, conibear-type or body-gripping traps shall be submerged in water at least fifty percent (50%) and foothold traps shall be completely submerged in water.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5873; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 7; Laws, 1988, ch. 435, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 463, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 401, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 489, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 522, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 491, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 514, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 49-7-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1989, ch. 377, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

[Codes, 1942, § 5874; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Am Laws, 1982, ch. 435, § 7; Laws, 1988, ch. 435, § 8]

§ 49-7-16.
Fur dealer or regular buyer of fur bearing animals; license; fees; possession of furs; tagging.

Any person, whether a resident or nonresident of this state, who is a fur dealer, or who regularly buys fur-bearing animals from trappers or hunters, shall be required to obtain a license under this section. Application for such license shall be made to any of the officials authorized to issue licenses under Chapter 7 of Title 49, Mississippi Code of 1972. The license fee shall be Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for residents, together with the fee provided in Section 49-7-17. The license shall be good for one (1) year from the date of issuance unless suspended or revoked earlier, and it is renewable upon payment of the fee. The license shall be carried on the person of the holder whenever he is engaged in the business of fur dealer or engaged in buying fur-bearing animals.

Dealers or those persons who regularly buy fur-bearing animals from trappers or hunters are authorized to possess inventories of dried or stretched furs and skins at any time. However, dealers or other fur buyers are authorized to buy, transport, sell or offer for sale inventories of fur for only ninety (90) days beyond the close of the trapping season set by the commission. The commission shall, in its discretion, extend the ninety-day period for buying, transporting, selling or offering for sale inventories of fur.

The commission may require tagging of furs to account for harvest of a species in a specific location. Dealers shall be required to maintain accurate records of purchases. Such dealer records and fur houses shall be open to conservation officers on request for inspection without warrant.

Persons acquiring fur for the sole purpose of tanning, dressing, manufacturing or otherwise preparing finished fur products are authorized to buy, sell, possess and transport inventories of fur and finished fur products at any time for these and related purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 13; Laws, 1980, ch. 448; Laws, 1982, ch. 435, § 8; Laws, 1988, ch. 435, § 9; Laws, 1989, ch. 377, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 62, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-17.
License agents; bonding requirements; additional license fee for officer or person issuing license; additional fee to recoup costs of issuing licenses.

The department may provide for the appointment of persons as license agents to sell license certificates for hunting, trapping or fishing as authorized under Section 49-7-21.

The department may, by administrative rule, establish qualifications, standards and regulations for such license agents.

Each license agent shall be required to be covered under a surety bond. The department may establish, by administrative rule, the procedures for the bonding of its license agents, which procedures may include the implementation of a blanket bonding system. All premiums for surety bonds required under this section shall be at the expense of the license agents.

Any officer or person authorized to issue any hunting or fishing license or permit or any combination game and fish license under the laws of this state shall have the power and authority to collect and retain for the issuance of such license the sum of One Dollar ($1.00), in addition to the license fee provided by law, when such license or permit is sold to a resident of this state. The Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks is authorized, in its discretion, to contract with license agents for services rendered for an additional amount, not to exceed One Dollar ($1.00), in addition to the license fee provided by law.

The Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks is authorized to establish, set and collect an additional fee for any license sold that will recoup the department’s cost of issuing the license, conducting any electronic transaction therefor, and generally recovering the department’s administrative costs of selling licenses and maintaining the electronic databases of those sales.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5874.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 219; Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 8; Laws, 1988, ch. 435, § 10; Laws, 1989, ch. 377, § 6; Laws, 1990, ch. 309, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 528, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 355, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 328, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 49-7-19.
Prohibition against issuing license to person physically or mentally unfit to carry or use firearm.

It shall be unlawful for any officer, authorized to issue the licenses mentioned in this chapter, to knowingly issue a resident license or nonresident license to any person physically or mentally unfit to carry or use firearms.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5875; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.